California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 401, Sec. 4.   (AB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.4.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 6700, 6702, and 6703, any vehicle which is registered to a nonresident owner, and which is based in California or primarily used on California highways, shall be registered in California.

(b) For purposes of this section, a vehicle is deemed to be primarily or regularly used on the highways of this state if the vehicle is located or operated in this state for a greater amount of time than it is located or operated in any other individual state during the registration period in question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1008, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.5.

(a) The department shall register an autoette, as defined in Section 175, as a motor vehicle.

(b) The owner of an autoette shall remove the license plates from the vehicle and return them to the department when the autoette is removed from a natural island, as described in Section 175.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4000.6.

A commercial motor vehicle, singly or in combination, that operates with a declared gross or combined gross vehicle weight that exceeds 10,000 pounds shall be registered pursuant to Section 9400.1.

(a) A person submitting an application for registration of a commercial motor vehicle operated in combination with a semitrailer, trailer, or any combination thereof, shall include the declared combined gross weight of all units when applying for registration with the department, except as exempted under subdivision (a) of Section 9400.1.

(b) This section does not apply to pickups nor to any commercial motor vehicle or combination that does not exceed 10,000 pounds gross vehicle weight.

(c) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, having reason to believe that a commercial motor vehicle is being operated, either singly or in combination, in excess of its registered declared gross or combined gross vehicle weight, may require the driver to stop and submit to an inspection or weighing of the vehicle or vehicles and an inspection of registration documents.

(d) A person shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle, either singly or in combination, in excess of its registered declared gross or combined gross vehicle weight.

(e) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine in an amount equal to the amount specified in Section 42030.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

All vehicles exempt from the payment of registration fees shall be registered as otherwise required by this code by the person having custody thereof, and he shall display upon the vehicle a license plate bearing distinguishing marks or symbols, which shall be furnished by the department free of charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

When moved or operated under a permit issued by the department, registration is not required of:

(a) A vehicle not previously registered while being moved or operated from a dealer’s, distributor’s, or manufacturer’s place of business to a place where essential parts of the vehicle are to be altered or supplied.

(b) A vehicle while being moved from a place of storage to another place of storage.

(c) A vehicle while being moved to or from a garage or repair shop for the purpose of repairs or alteration.

(d) A vehicle while being moved or operated for the purpose of dismantling or wrecking the same and permanently removing it from the highways.

(e) A vehicle, while being moved from one place to another for the purpose of inspection by the department, assignment of a vehicle identification number, inspection of pollution control devices, or weighing the vehicle.

(f) A vehicle, the construction of which has not been completed, until such time as the construction thereof is completed and final weights and costs can be determined for registration purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 326.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

A permit, as described in Section 9258, may be issued by the department for operating any of the following vehicles, except a crane:

(a) A vehicle while being moved or operated unladen for one continuous trip from a place within this state to another place either within or without this state or from a place without this state to a place within this state.

(b) A vehicle while being moved or operated for one round trip to be completed within 60 days from one place to another for the purpose of participating as a vehicular float or display in a lawful parade or exhibition, provided that the total round trip does not exceed 100 miles.

The department may issue a quantity of permits under this subsection in booklet form upon payment of the proper fee for each permit contained in such booklet. Each permit shall be valid for only one vehicle and for only one continuous trip. Such permit shall be posted upon the windshield or other prominent place upon a vehicle and shall identify the vehicle to which it is affixed. When so affixed, such permit shall serve in lieu of California registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 326.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.5.

(a) Upon payment of the fee specified in Section 9258.5, the department shall issue to a manufacturer or dealer a one-trip permit authorizing a new trailer, semitrailer, or auxiliary dolly that has never been registered in any state, or a used trailer, semitrailer, or auxiliary dolly that is not currently registered, to be moved or operated laden within, entering, or leaving this state for not more than 10 days as part of one continuous trip from the place of manufacture for a new vehicle, or from the place of dispatch or entry into this state
 for a used vehicle, to a place where the vehicle will be offered for sale.

(b) Any permit issued pursuant to this section authorizes the operation of a single trailer, semitrailer, or auxiliary dolly, and the permit shall identify the trailer, semitrailer, or auxiliary dolly authorized by make, model, and vehicle identification number. The permit shall include the name and license number of the manufacturer from whom the new vehicle is sent, or the name and license number of the dealer from whom the used vehicle is sent, the name and address of the person or business receiving the load, a description of the load being carried, and the name and license number of the dealer who will be offering the trailer, semitrailer, or auxiliary dolly for sale. Each permit shall be completed prior to operation of the trailer or semitrailer or auxiliary dolly
 on a highway. The permit shall be carried on the trailer, semitrailer, or auxiliary dolly to which it applies in an appropriate receptacle inaccessible from the inside of the cab and shall be readily available for inspection by a peace officer. Each permit is valid at the time of inspection by a peace officer only if it has been completed as required by the department and has been placed in the appropriate receptacle as required by this section. The manufacturer or dealer issued the permit may allow a third party to move or operate the vehicle.

(c) The privilege of securing and displaying a permit authorized pursuant to this section shall not be extended to a manufacturer, carrier, or dealer located in a jurisdiction with which the state does not have vehicle licensing reciprocity.

(d) The privilege of securing and displaying a permit authorized pursuant to this section shall not be granted more than once without the sale and registration of the trailer, semitrailer, or auxiliary dolly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 301, Sec. 1.   (AB 27)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

(a) (1) Commercial motor vehicles meeting the registration requirements of a foreign jurisdiction, and subject to registration but not entitled to exemption from registration or licensing under any of the provisions of this code or any agreements, arrangements, or declarations made under Article 3 (commencing with Section 8000) of Chapter 4, may, as an alternate to registration, secure a temporary registration to operate in this state for a period of not to exceed 90 days, or a trip permit to operate in this state for a period of four consecutive days.

(2) Each trip permit shall authorize the operation of a single commercial motor vehicle for a period of not more
 than four consecutive days, commencing with the day of first use and three consecutive days thereafter. Every permit shall identify, as the department may require, the commercial motor vehicle for which it is issued. Each trip permit shall be completed prior to operation of the commercial motor vehicle on any highway in this state and shall be carried in the commercial motor vehicle to which it applies and shall be readily available for inspection by a peace officer. Each permit shall be valid at the time of inspection by a peace officer only if it has been completed as required by the department and has been placed in the appropriate receptacle as required by this section. It is unlawful for any person to fail to comply with the provisions of this section.

(b) The privilege of securing and using a trip permit or a temporary registration not to exceed 90 days shall not extend to a vehicle that is based within this state and is operated by a
 person having an established place of business within this state. For purposes of this paragraph, a commercial motor vehicle shall be considered to be based in this state if it is primarily operated or dispatched from or principally garaged or serviced or maintained at a site with an address within this state.

(c) Any trailer or semitrailer identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 that enters the state without a currently valid license plate issued by California or another jurisdiction shall be immediately subject to full identification fees as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 5014.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 315, Sec. 8.   (AB 28)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.5.

The owner of any motor vehicle subject to the registration provisions of this chapter, or exempted therefrom, may file with the department, at the time he registers or renews the registration of such motor vehicle, a signed statement that he resides in more than one county for a period of more than 30 days, or uses such vehicle in a county other than the county of his legal residence for business purposes. Such statement shall specify the address at which the owner resides in any county for more than 30 days, if any, or the length of time during which such owner uses the motor vehicle for business purposes in any county.

The department shall provide forms for the filing of such statements and shall take into consideration the length of time during which owners reside or use motor vehicles in counties, in accordance with the statements filed with the department, to determine the total number of vehicles registered or exempted from registration in any particular county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1485.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.7.

(a) If the apportioned registration issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 for a commercial vehicle or vehicle combination that was last registered by a California resident has expired or has been terminated, the department, upon receipt of a completed application, a fee of thirty dollars ($30), and proof of financial responsibility for the vehicle, may issue an unladen operation permit to authorize the unladen operation of that vehicle or vehicle combination for a period of not more than 15 continuous days.

(b) This section does not apply to any vehicle or vehicle combination for which any vehicle registration fees, other than those for the current year, vehicle license fees, or penalties, or any combination of those are due.

(c) Operation of a laden vehicle or vehicle combination under an unladen operation permit issued pursuant to this section is an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 539, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

Any vehicle subject to registration may be operated within a disaster area or region for the purpose of assisting in disaster relief work, under a special permit to be issued by the department for such purpose, without the registration of such vehicle.

Said permit shall be issued only if the Department of Transportation or the responsible local authority has determined that the vehicle is necessary for such purpose, and shall be valid only during a period of a state of emergency as proclaimed by the Governor under the provisions of the California Emergency Services Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

A vehicle which is driven or moved upon a highway only for the purpose of crossing the highway from one property to another in accordance with a permit issued by the Department of Transportation is exempt from registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.

The department, the Public Utilities Commission, and the State Board of Equalization shall enter into an interagency agreement to establish a coordinated system for the issuance of temporary operating authority to carriers of passengers for compensation by motor vehicles which are operating under the laws of another state or country. The agreement shall designate a lead agency from among the parties to the agreement to which the carrier may make a single application for the temporary operating authority required under the laws of this state. The lead agency shall coordinate and expedite all matters relating to issuance of the temporary operating authority and the collection and distribution of fees therefor with every other state agency having jurisdiction, so as to promptly prepare and issue the required operating authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 510, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.

A vehicle transported upon a highway, no part of which is in contact with the highway, is exempt from registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

Special construction equipment and special mobile equipment are exempt from registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1659.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.

Any vehicle, implement, or equipment specifically designed or altered for and used exclusively in the maintenance or operation of cemetery grounds, which is only incidentally operated or moved on a highway is exempt from registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 999.)
-------------------------------------------

4013.

Any forklift truck which is designed primarily for loading and unloading and for stacking materials and is operated upon a highway only for the purpose of transporting products or material across a highway in the loading, unloading or stacking process, and is in no event operated along a highway for a greater distance than one-quarter mile is exempt from registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4014.

Any portable or collapsible dolly carried in a tow truck or in a truck used by an automobile dismantler and used upon a highway exclusively for towing disabled vehicles is exempt from registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 924, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4015.

Any privately owned vehicle designed or capable of being used for firefighting purposes when operated upon a highway only in responding to, and returning from, emergency fire calls is exempt from registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1643.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4000, unregistered vehicles may be left standing upon a highway adjacent to a vehicle dealer’s place of business when done so in connection with the loading and unloading of vehicles to be used in the dealer’s business, unless otherwise prohibited by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1233.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.

The provisions of Section 4000 shall not apply to the moving or operating of a vehicle during the period of time in which application may be made for registration of the vehicle without penalty as provided in Section 4152.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

4018.

Any logging vehicle is exempt from registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 517.)
-------------------------------------------

4019.

A golf cart operated pursuant to Section 21115 is exempt from registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1303.)
-------------------------------------------

4020.

A motorized bicycle operated upon a highway is exempt from registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 987.)
-------------------------------------------

4021.

Any vehicle that is designed or altered for, and used exclusively for, the refueling of aircraft at a public airport is exempt from registration, if the vehicle is operated upon a highway under the control of a local authority for a continuous distance not exceeding one-half mile each way to and from a bulk fuel storage facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 57.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.

A vehicle repossessed pursuant to the terms of a security agreement is exempt from registration solely for the purpose of transporting the vehicle from the point of repossession to the storage facilities of the repossessor, and from the storage facilities to the legal owner or a licensed motor vehicle auction, provided that the repossessor transports with the vehicle the appropriate documents authorizing the repossession and makes them available to a law enforcement officer on request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 505, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.

A low-speed vehicle operated pursuant to Section 21115 or 21115.1 is exempt from registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Original Registration [4150. - 4166.]

4150.

Application for the original or renewal registration of a vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code shall be made by the owner to the department upon the appropriate form furnished by it and shall contain all of the following:

(a) The true, full name, business or residence and mailing address, and driver’s license or identification card number, if any, of the owner, and the true, full name and business or residence or mailing address of the legal owner, if any.

(b) The name of the county in which the owner resides.

(c) A description of the vehicle, including the following data insofar as they may exist:

(1) The make, model, and type of body.

(2) The vehicle identification number or any other identifying number as may be required by the department.

(3) The date first sold by a manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer to a consumer.

(d) Any other information that is reasonably required by the department to enable it to determine whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4150.1.

(a) On a form provided by the department, the registered owner of record, lessee, or the owner’s designee shall certify and report the declared gross or combined gross vehicle weight of any commercial motor vehicle, singly or in combination, in excess of 10,000 pounds.

(b) A single form may be used or referenced for multiple vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 826, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4150.2.

Application for the original registration or renewal of the registration of a motorcycle shall be made by the owner to the department upon the appropriate form furnished by it, and shall contain all of the following:

(a) The true, full name, business or residence and mailing address, and driver’s license or identification card number, if any, of the owner, and the true, full name and business or residence or mailing address of the legal owner, if any.

(b) The name of the county in which the owner resides.

(c) A description of the motorcycle, including the following data insofar as they may exist:

(1) The make and type of body.

(2) The motor and vehicle identification numbers recorded exactly as they appear on the engine and frame, respectively, by the manufacturer, and any other identifying number of the motorcycle as may be required by the department.

(3) The date first sold by a manufacturer, remanufacturer, or dealer to a consumer.

(d) Any other information that is reasonably required by the department to enable it to determine whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration.

(e) The department shall maintain a cross-index file of motor and vehicle identification numbers registered with it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1221, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4150.5.

Ownership of title to a vehicle subject to registration may be held by two (or more) coowners as provided in Section 682 of the Civil Code, except that:

(a) A vehicle may be registered in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or.” A vehicle so registered in the alternative shall be deemed to be held in joint tenancy. Each coowner shall be deemed to have granted to the other coowners the absolute right to dispose of the title and interest in the vehicle. Upon the death of a coowner the interest of the decedent shall pass to the survivor as though title or interest in the vehicle was held in joint tenancy unless a contrary intention is set forth in writing upon the application for registration.

(b) A vehicle may be registered in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or” and if declared in writing upon the application for registration by the applicants to be community property, or tenancy in common, shall grant to each coowner the absolute power to transfer the title or interest of the other coowners only during the lifetime of such coowners.

(c) A vehicle may be registered in the names of two (or more) persons as coowners in the conjunctive by the use of the word “and” and shall thereafter require the signature of each coowner or his personal representative to transfer title to the vehicle, except where title to the vehicle is set forth in joint tenancy, the signature of each coowner or his personal representative shall be required only during the lifetime of the coowners, and upon death of a coowner title shall pass to the surviving coowner.

(d) The department may adopt suitable abbreviations to appear upon the certificate of registration and certificate of ownership to designate the manner in which title to the vehicle is held if set forth by the coowners upon the application for registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 891.)
-------------------------------------------

4150.7.

(a) Ownership of title to a vehicle subject to registration may be held in beneficiary form that includes a direction to transfer ownership of the vehicle to a designated beneficiary on the death of the owner if both of the following requirements are satisfied: 

(1) Only one owner is designated. 

(2) Only one TOD beneficiary is designated. 

(b) A certificate of ownership issued in beneficiary form shall include, after the name of the owner, the words “transfer on death to” or the abbreviation “TOD” followed by the name of the beneficiary. 

(c) During the lifetime of the owner, the signature or consent of the beneficiary is not required for any transaction relating to the vehicle for which a certificate of ownership in beneficiary form has been issued. 

(d) The fee for registering ownership of a vehicle in a beneficiary form is ten dollars ($10).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 58.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 1055.)
-------------------------------------------

4151.

The department shall not accept an application for the original registration of a vehicle in this State unless the vehicle at the time of application is within this State unless the provisions of Section 4152 are complied with.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4152.

(a) The department may accept an application for registration of a vehicle which is not within this state, but which is to be registered to a resident of this state, at the time all documents and fees, as determined by the department in accordance with the provisions of this division, are submitted to the department.

(b) Any fees submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be subject to refund based upon the fact that the vehicle has not been and is not within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1220.)
-------------------------------------------

4152.5.

Except as provided for in subdivision (c) of Section 9553, when California registration is required of a vehicle last registered in a foreign jurisdiction, an application for registration shall be made to the department within 20 days following the date registration became due. The application shall be deemed an original application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1035, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4153.

If the vehicle to be registered is a specially constructed or remanufactured vehicle, the application shall also state that fact and contain additional information as may reasonably be required by the department to enable it properly to register the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

4154.

The department may not issue or renew the registration of a farm labor vehicle unless the owner of the vehicle provides verification to the department that the inspection required by Section 31401 has been performed. For these purposes, the department shall determine what constitutes appropriate verification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4155.

Registration under this code shall apply to any vehicle owned by the United States government, the state, or any city, county, or political subdivision of the state, except in the following particulars:

(a) A license plate issued for a vehicle while publicly owned need not display the year number for which it is issued, but shall display a distinguishing symbol or letter.

(b) The registration of the vehicle and the registration card issued therefor shall not be renewed annually but shall remain valid until the certificate of ownership is suspended, revoked, or canceled by the department or upon a transfer of any interest shown in the certificate of ownership. If ownership of the vehicle is transferred to any person, the vehicle shall be reregistered as a privately owned vehicle and the special license plates shall be surrendered to the department.

(c) An identification plate used for special construction, cemetery, or special mobile equipment need not display a distinguishing symbol or letter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

4156.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, and except as provided in subdivision (b), the department in its discretion may issue a temporary permit to operate a vehicle when a payment of fees has been accepted in an amount to be determined by, and paid to the department, by the owner or other person in lawful possession of the vehicle. The permit shall be subject to the terms and conditions, and shall be valid for the period of time, that the department shall deem appropriate under the circumstances.

(b) (1) The department shall not issue a temporary permit pursuant to subdivision (a) to operate a vehicle for which a certificate of compliance is required pursuant to Section 4000.3, and for which that certificate of compliance has not
 been issued, unless the department is presented with sufficient evidence, as determined by the department, that the vehicle has failed its most recent smog check inspection.

(2) Only one temporary permit may be issued pursuant to this subdivision to a vehicle owner in a two-year period.

(3) A temporary permit issued pursuant to paragraph (1) is valid for either 60 days after the expiration of the registration of the vehicle or 60 days after the date that vehicle is removed from nonoperation, whichever is applicable at the time that the temporary permit is issued.

(4) A temporary permit issued pursuant to paragraph (1) is subject to Section 9257.5.

(c) (1) The department may issue a temporary permit pursuant to subdivision (a) to
 operate a vehicle for which registration may be refused pursuant to Section 4000.15.

(2) Only one temporary permit may be issued pursuant to this subdivision for any vehicle, unless otherwise approved by the State Air Resources Board.

(3) A temporary permit issued pursuant to paragraph (1) is valid for either 90 days after the expiration of the registration of the vehicle or 90 days after the date that vehicle is removed from nonoperation, whichever is applicable at the time the temporary permit is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 21.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4156.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department in its discretion may issue a temporary permit to operate a vehicle when a payment of fees has been accepted in an amount to be determined by, and paid to, the department by the owner or other person in lawful possession of the vehicle, for a vehicle for which registration may be refused pursuant to Section 4000.17. The permit shall be subject to the terms and conditions that the department shall deem appropriate under the circumstances.

(b) The department shall not issue a temporary permit pursuant to subdivision (a) to operate a vehicle for which a certificate of compliance is required pursuant to Section
 4000.17, and for which that certificate of compliance has not been issued, unless the department is presented with sufficient evidence, as determined by the department, that the vehicle has failed its most recent inspection pursuant to the Heavy-Duty Vehicle Inspection and Maintenance Program (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 44150) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code).

(c) Only one temporary permit may be issued pursuant to this section for any vehicle, unless otherwise approved by the State Air Resources Board.

(d) A temporary permit issued pursuant to this section is valid for either 60 days after the expiration of the registration of the vehicle or 60 days after the date that vehicle is removed from nonoperation, whichever is applicable at the time
 the temporary permit is issued.

(e) (1) A fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be paid for a temporary
 permit issued pursuant to this section.

(2) The fee authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be adjusted annually based on the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(3) After deducting its administrative costs, the department shall deposit fees collected pursuant to paragraph (1) in the Truck Emission Check (TEC) Fund created pursuant to Section 44154 of the Health and Safety Code, to be used for regulatory activities under the Heavy-Duty Vehicle Inspection and Maintenance Program (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 44150) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 298, Sec. 4.   (SB 210)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4157.

In the absence of the regularly required supporting evidence of ownership upon application for registration or transfer of a vehicle, the department may accept an undertaking or bond which shall be conditioned to protect the department and all officers and employees thereof and any subsequent purchaser of the vehicle, any person acquiring a lien or security interest thereon, or the successor in interest of such purchaser or person against any loss or damage on account of any defect in or undisclosed claim upon the right, title, and interest of the applicant or other person in and to the vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

4158.

In the event the vehicle is no longer registered in this state and the currently valid certificate of ownership is surrendered to the department, the bond or undertaking shall be returned and surrendered at the end of three years or prior thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

4159.

Whenever any person after making application for the registration of a vehicle required to be registered under this code, or after obtaining registration either as owner or legal owner, moves or acquires a new address different from the address shown in the application or upon the certificate of ownership or registration card, such person shall, within 10 days thereafter, notify the department of his old and new address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 552.)
-------------------------------------------

4160.

Any registered owner of a vehicle who moves or acquires a new address different from the address shown upon the registration card issued for the vehicle shall within 10 days mark out the former address shown on the face of the card and with pen and ink write or type the new address on the face of the card immediately below the former address with the initials of the registered owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

4161.

(a) Whenever a motor vehicle engine or motor is installed, except temporarily, in a motor vehicle which is identified on the ownership and registration certificates by motor or engine number or by both the motor and frame numbers and subject to registration under this code, the owner of the motor vehicle shall, within 10 days thereafter, give notice to the department upon a form furnished by it containing a description of the motor vehicle engine or motor installed, including any identifying number thereon and the date of the installation. The owner of the motor vehicle shall also submit to the department with the notice the certificate of ownership and registration card covering the motor vehicle in which the motor vehicle engine or motor is installed and evidence of ownership covering the new or used motor vehicle engine or motor installed and such other documents as may be required by the department.

(b) Upon receipt of motor vehicle engine or motor change notification and other required documents, the department shall assign a distinguishing vehicle identification number to motor vehicles, other than motorcycles or motor-driven cycles registered under a motor number or motor and frame numbers. When the distinguishing vehicle identification number is placed on the vehicle as authorized, the vehicle shall thereafter be identified by the distinguishing identification number assigned.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other provision of law, whenever an application is made to the department to register a replacement engine case for any motorcycle, the department shall request the Department of the California Highway Patrol to inspect the motorcycle to determine its proper identity. If the replacement engine case bears the same identifying numbers as the engine case being replaced, the original engine case shall be destroyed. A determination verifying proof of destruction shall be made by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4163.

The owner of three or more motor vehicles is not required to notify the department or to pay the fee required under Section 9257 when motor vehicle engines or motors owned by him are installed in or transferred between the motor vehicles owned by him until the motor vehicle is sold, transferred, or otherwise disposed of by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

4166.

The department may assign a distinguishing vehicle identification number to a motor vehicle whenever the motor or other identifying number thereon is removed, destroyed or obliterated, and any motor vehicle to which a distinguishing vehicle identification number is assigned as authorized herein shall be registered under the number so assigned when registration of the motor vehicle is required under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 824.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Registration of Foreign Vehicles [4300. - 4309.]

4300.

Upon application for registration of a vehicle previously registered outside this State, the application shall be certified by the applicant and shall state that the vehicle previously has been registered outside this State, the time and place of the last registration of such vehicle outside this State, the name and address of the governmental officer, agency, or authority making the registration, and such further information relative to its previous registration as may reasonably be required by the department, including the time and place of original registration, if known, and if different from the last foreign registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4300.5.

An application for registration under this chapter of a vehicle previously registered outside of this state shall be accompanied by payment of the amount required to be paid under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code with respect to the use of the vehicle by the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 205.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.

The applicant shall surrender to the department all unexpired license plates, seals, certificates, or other evidence of foreign registration as may be in his possession or under his control. The department may require a certification from the jurisdiction of last registry when the applicant fails to surrender the last issued unexpired license plates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

Upon application made at the time of their surrender to the department and upon payment of a fee of one dollar ($1), the department shall return the unexpired license plates to the official in charge of the registration of motor vehicles in the state of issue of the license plates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)